Connecticut, session 2026, HB05491.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than January 1,
2027, the Labor Commissioner shall create an informational web page,
as part of the Internet web site of the Labor Department, to serve as a
central repository of information, resources and materials, including
links to external sources of such information, resources and materials
regarding (1) job training, career counseling and workforce
development organizations and opportunities available, (2) regional
sector partnerships, and (3) other topics relevant to workforce
development. The Labor Commissioner shall, on a semiannual basis,
update the information, resources and materials described in this
section for items to be included on such informational web page.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026